%BOM---------------------
Date:12/30/2002 10:21:55 AM
From:Marc Fortier
A little math tells me that you averaged 91 post per day -- provided that you
were on duty every day for the last three years. Well, if you are busy on your
PC twelve hours a day, that's 7.5 posts per hour. I hope that you still have a
life to live...
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:12/30/2002 10:27:30 AM
From:Baldur Fjvlnisson
Well, it's not about averages. In the fall of 2000 when I

was disseminating information about Microsoft's and Cisco's stock watering
scams (zillions of other scams are modeled after these premier scam owners of
Uncle Scam) I did 100-200 posts/day easily. On various message boards. I always
looked for boards frequented by active traders.

December 2000 was very active. The U.S. stock market suffered from lousy
dissemination of reliable information at the time and major criminal garbage
and other Wall St. mob outfits were actually taken seriously. And of course St.
Greenscam and his stooges were considered almost semi godlings. I was just
performing a public service.

The drop hollows the stone. The internet is a godsend.

It's merely a question of patience and diligent dissemination of information.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:12/30/2002 10:32:27 AM
From:Baldur Fjvlnisson
I may have posted this a few dozen times before, hehehehe.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:12/30/2002 10:33:55 AM
From:Scott Mc
Value Investing - Concentration
I've tended to hold a large number of companies 70-80, I have decided to move
towards a more concentrated holding (approx 15). I am finding this extremely
difficult, however I expect it will focus my thinking. Does anyone have any
experiences or care to discuss the pros and cons of diversification versus
concentration?
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:12/30/2002 10:34:01 AM
From:Baldur Fjvlnisson
Have fun loading up on fraudulent and bankrupt junk.

Happy bankruptcies and bon voyage to hell with the Bush
nutcase at the helm.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:12/30/2002 10:39:22 AM
From:Marc Fortier
Well, good luck to you... and don't forget that there is still a life to be
live out there.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:12/30/2002 10:42:52 AM
From:Baldur Fjvlnisson
Don't worry, this is just a hobby. As before; I think it's

pretty interesting to watch the world's largest economy go down the toilet.

I'm not saying much will happen when this whole fraudulent mess collapses.
There are only 200 million firearms in America.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:12/30/2002 11:02:43 AM
From:Marc Fortier
It's an interesting topic. I have never been as large as 70 to 80. Right now, I
am holding 24 stocks which is a lot for me.

How much should you hold? I'd say that it depends on a lot of factors. Which
kind of investor you are is one. How big is your portfolio in value is an other
one.

My portfolio still being modest, it would not be economical to diversify in 70
or 80 stocks. I also like to be more focused on specific stories. It would be
difficult while holding so many stocks...

There are two things about diversification that I have learned in the past
years:

1. You really have to be prudent about sector diversification. I don't mean to
hold a stock in every sector, but certainly not to invest just in one or two
sectors. Geographic diversification is also important, albeit hard to achieve
through the markets (mutual funds may be a solution here). IMO, you at least
should make sure that a good part of your holdings have significant income
abroad.

2. A prudent investor should also make sure that he is not over-weighted on a
position, particularly on a shaky one. I know that the mantra is to sell the
loser and to hang on the winner, but when you winner has become too big
compared to the rest of your portfolio, you should consider to sell part of the
profit and rebalance the proceedings. Of course, some investors may think
otherwise (Warren Buffett certainly do), but you have to be quite sure of your
thinking if you decide to hold to your gains.

This is not great thinking, but it's my opinion. Hope this will help.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:12/30/2002 11:20:58 AM
From:Scott Mc
Diversification
The 2 great value investors (Graham and Buffet)have/had completely different
views on this subject, one picking up the cigarette butts and the other the
castles with the moat.

I find my diversification reduces risk but is making for sloppy thinking and
its difficult to know the companies as well as I would like to. It also makes
those tough decisions (when to sell) harder. I want to think of my portfolio
more like a team, keeping the best players and cutting the slackers. Probably
the best way would be for me to set a maximum # of stocks and having the
discipline to stick to it.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:12/30/2002 12:12:51 PM
From:Marc Fortier
The idea of a your portfolio seen as a team sounds good to me. Some players are
good on offense (when the market is good), others on defense. Some are young
players, experiencing strong growth, but they also can disappoint for their
lack of depth... Others are what Peter Lynch called stalwarts (correct me if
the spelling isn't good), slow growers, but experienced and dependable... There
are also special situations: great prospects or experienced players going
through tough times. Nobody wants them anymore, but you see value... They can
turn around and be profitable again, as you know.

The idea is to put all these players in your team. And if each one becomes
valuable, you'll have a great machine, working on all cylinders... But, as you
know, machines need to be fixed, parts replaced... Unfortunately, it's a
never-ending job... You may have "core" positions, but others won't be held for
long; they'll be removed once the prospects won't be as good...

I don't know the size of your portfolio, but IMO you'd probably have very good
diversification holding no more than 40 to 50 stocks (let's say a "football"
team). As I wrote before, I don't hold that many stocks, but I can see it as a
possibility if I had a portfolio of at least $200,000 in value.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:12/30/2002 12:27:45 PM
From:Softechie
Baldur I hope you're not scaring these folks here...hehheeheh
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:12/30/2002 12:39:53 PM
From:Baldur Fjvlnisson
What's so scary about at least 150 of the S&P 500 being

technically bankrupt?

I seriously doubt that more than 1500-2000 companies in the U.S. stock market
are bankrupt.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:12/30/2002 1:10:50 PM
From:Softechie
Earnings `Time Bomb' Looms in U.S. as Pension Fund Losses Mount
By David Evans

New York, Dec. 30 (Bloomberg) -- According to its annual report released in
March 2002, Verizon Communications Inc., the largest U.S. local phone company,
had a strong year in 2001. In the opening pages of the report, the company
announced an annual profit of $389 million.

Only those investors who dug into the small print at the back of the document
learned that Verizon's reported earnings included $2.7 billion in gains from
its pension fund investments -- profit that didn't really exist. The company
pension fund actually lost $3.1 billion in 2001, a footnote on page 58 of the
68-page report revealed.

In reporting gains it hadn't made, Verizon didn't violate any rules. Like other
U.S. companies, Verizon was following accounting practices as written in 1985
by the Financial Accounting Standards Board, which sets U.S. accounting
standards.

The FASB rules say that in preparing income statements, companies should
include estimated gains -- not actual gains or losses -- from pension fund
investments.

Legal or not, the practice has incensed some investors. ``There's a serious
illness pervading a portion of the financial market,'' says Kathleen Connell,
California controller and a board member of the state's two largest pension
funds: the California State Teachers' Retirement System and the California
Public Employees' Retirement System.

She says accounting rules are allowing companies to artificially increase stock
prices. ``Phantom pension earnings are portrayed as income,'' she says. ``It's
a ticking time bomb.''

As the stock market plunged during the past three years, the pension funds of
companies in the Standard & Poor's 500 Index lost more than $200 billion in
value, according to studies by actuaries and several investment banks,
including Credit Suisse First Boston and UBS Warburg LLC.

Losses Weren't Reported

Because of FASB accounting rules, many of those losses weren't reported on
balance sheets.

If pension liabilities had been counted in financial statements, aggregate
earnings for the S&P 500 would have been 69 percent lower than the companies
reported for 2001, or $68.7 billion rather than $219 billion, the CSFB study
found.

``We're starting to see billions of dollars of shareholder equity vaporized
because of pension underfunding,'' says Marc Siegel, a senior analyst at the
Center for Financial Research & Analysis, an accounting research firm in
Rockville, Maryland. ``It's much more pervasive than anything Enron was
doing.''

Over the past three years, most companies have allowed their pension fund
losses to grow -- out of the sight of balance sheets and investors -- without
addressing the problem, says David Bianco, who headed research into the issue
for UBS Warburg.

Too Big to Ignore

Now, the liabilities have become too big to ignore. Many of the largest
companies will be spending hundreds of millions -- and in some cases, billions
-- of dollars to replenish pension funds in 2003 and beyond, according to CSFB
and UBS Warburg.

Ford Motor Co., the world's second-largest automaker, said in November it would
put $500 million into its pension fund in both 2003 and 2004.

SBC Communications Inc., the second-largest U.S. local phone company, said in
November it would pay $1 billion to $2 billion into its pension and
postretirement health benefit funds in 2003, thereby reducing earnings by 20
cents to 40 cents a share.

On Dec. 5, Verizon said its earnings per share in 2003 would decline by between
27 cents and 33 cents because of lower pension income.

Many companies' reported profit will be reduced, say CSFB and UBS Warburg.

Other companies could face the same dilemma as Georgia- Pacific Corp., the
world's second-largest paper and building- products manufacturer, which said in
November that pension fund losses would require a charge to shareholder equity
as high as $600 million in the fourth quarter of 2002.

Violation of Agreement

The charge would have placed the company in violation of a $2.4 billion loan
agreement until a group of lenders, including Bank of America Corp., agreed to
a waiver. Georgia-Pacific was required to pay the lenders an undisclosed fee to
receive the waiver.

In October, Standard & Poor's lowered the long-term debt rating of both General
Motors Corp. and Ford to BBB, two levels above junk, from BBB+, citing pension
fund liabilities.

Another complication: As companies spend more to replenish pension funds in the
next two years, that money will not be available for spending on such
improvements as new buildings and manufacturing equipment. A study by Goldman
Sachs Group Inc. estimates companies will need to channel an extra $80 billion
a year to adequately fund pension accounts.

Economic Output

Bobby Inman, director of the U.S. National Security Agency from 1977 to 1981
and a board member of four companies -- Fluor Corp., an international
construction company; coalmine operator Massey Energy Co.; Temple-Inland Inc.,
a paper-products manufacturer; and SBC -- says the pension liabilities could
trim national economic output.

``What it's taking is the money that could otherwise be used for growth,'' says
Inman, who chairs SBC's compensation and pension committee. ``There clearly
will be an impact.''

The pension fund time bomb is coming as a shock to many investors because
accounting rules have allowed the liabilities to remain virtually
incomprehensible in the footnotes of financial statements, says Howard Schilit,
an accountant and president of the Center for Financial Research & Analysis.

``There should be better disclosure,'' Schilit says. ``Even our clients, who
are sophisticated investors, don't completely understand.''

General Electric Co., the world's largest company by market value, reported
pension fund gains of $2.1 billion for 2001, or 11 percent of the company's
pretax profit of $19.7 billion.

Lost $2.9 Billion

Difficult to find in GE's annual report was the fact that the company hadn't
gained $2.1 billion from its pension investments that year; it lost $2.9
billion.

GE spokesman David Frail says the company reported the pension gain according
to FASB rules. ``It's not hard to spot the loss,'' says Frail. ``It's on page
72, in footnote six.''

General Motors, the world's largest automaker, said in October that the value
of its U.S. pension funds had fallen by 10 percent, or $6.7 billion, in the
first nine months of 2002. That's the same percentage the company told
shareholders on March 12 it had expected to gain in all of 2002.

GM said its pension funds were valued at $73.7 billion on Dec. 31, 2001 -- more
than triple the $21 billion current market value of GM stock.

``It just keeps getting worse,'' says UBS Warburg analyst Bianco. ``GM is a
highly leveraged mutual fund with a car company attached.''

Payments to Retirees

Pension fund losses should not disrupt payments to retirees even if a pension
fund runs out of money because the Pension Benefit Guaranty Corp. (PBGC), a
federal agency funded by mandatory insurance payments from companies, pays
retirees when a company fails. The agency pays annual pension benefits of as
much as $42,954 per person, says spokesman Jeffrey Speicher.

``We are the insurers of last resort,'' Speicher says. ``If a pension plan is
underfunded and has to terminate, we step in and pay the benefit.'' The agency
had reserves of $7.7 billion as of Sept. 30, 2001.

Among S&P 500 companies, 360 have defined-benefit pension plans, which are
funded by the companies and guarantee a certain payment every month. Many of
the newer companies, including certain large technology firms, never had
defined-benefit pension plans.

Benefit Executives

Some retirees who remain shareholders in their companies say corporations are
using pension funds to benefit executives at the expense of investors. At
annual meetings in 2002, shareholders of International Business Machines Corp.,
GE and Verizon introduced proposals that would stop companies from including
pension gains as part of the earnings companies use to determine executive
bonuses.

All of the proposals were opposed by the companies and were defeated in
shareholder votes. ``The retirees' pension fund has become a profit center for
the company,'' says Joe Ristuccia, 71, who retired as a Verizon district plant
superintendent in 1989 after 33 years of service.

Ristuccia cosponsored the proposal at Verizon, which garnered 43 percent of
shareholder votes. ``It's outrageous,'' he says. ``I was betrayed by my
company.''

Ivan Seidenberg, Verizon's chief executive officer, was paid a $2.4 million
cash bonus for 2001. Company spokesman Varettoni says pension income is one of
many factors used in determining bonuses.

Estimated Gain

Most companies have been reporting an estimated gain of about 9.5 percent in
pension fund investments during the stock market slide that began in 2000, UBS
Warburg says. For a company as large as IBM, that meant reporting a gain of
$1.3 billion from pension fund investments in 2001, after expenses.

An investor reading IBM's annual report filed in March would look at the
balance sheet and the management discussion that follows without seeing any
mention of actual pension fund returns. The discussion does refer to recent
stock-market losses.

``Although actual returns in 2001 were less than expected returns in the U.S.
pension plan, the cumulative excess of actual returns over expected returns was
$5.3 billion since 1986,'' the report says.

The reader would have to go 35 pages deeper into the report to find a footnote
containing dozens of raw numbers related to pension investments and
obligations. The footnote says that for 2000 and 2001, while IBM recorded
assumed pension returns of $12.2 billion, the funds actually lost $2.8 billion
-- a disparity of $15 billion.

`Billions of Dollars'

``If you've got assumptions that make a difference of billions of dollars in
your bottom line, it seems to me that's the kind of thing people want to know
about,'' says Simon Lorne, former general counsel at the U.S. Securities and
Exchange Commission.

Lorne, now a partner at law firm Munger Tolles & Olson in Los Angeles, says
that when it comes to pension performance, financial statements talk about the
trees and ignore the forest. ``These numbers ought to be clearly shown in
companies' financial reports,'' he says.

IBM spokeswoman Carol Malkovich defends the company's reporting practices.
``This accounting treatment is not unique to IBM,'' she says. ``It's FASB
accounting followed by thousands of companies and fully disclosed in our annual
report.''

On Dec. 4, IBM said it had paid $3 billion into its U.S. pension fund to cover
all of its underfunding. Chief Financial Officer John Joyce declined to say how
the payment would affect fourth-quarter earnings.

Smooth Out Volatility

FASB's decision that companies should use an estimate for pension fund
investment gains every year was intended to smooth out potential stock market
volatility in earnings computations, says Tim Lucas, project manager of the
FASB team that wrote the rule known as Financial Accounting Standard No. 87, or
FAS 87.

Lucas says that when FASB decided on the standard in 1985, it reasoned that
stock-market trends had historically shown a gain during any 10-year period.
So, regardless of market performance in a given year, an estimated gain over
time was a safe and logical bet.

``We thought the investor was not going to be a whole lot better served by
having the bottom line move around wildly each year,'' Lucas says. The plan
worked without problems in its first decade, Lucas says.

What the rule's authors didn't anticipate was the stock- market boom of the
late 1990s and the equally large decline that began in March 2000.

Two or Three Times

In the late 1990s, as companies reported pension fund earnings of about 9.5
percent, those investments had actually made two or three times that amount,
company filings show. As a result, many companies made small or no
contributions to pension funds during those years, says SBC director Inman.

``They earned so much money that corporations didn't have to put in anything
annually to cover pension costs,'' he says. ``It was a free ride.''

As pension investments began losing money in 2000, most companies still had a
cushion in their pension funds, annual reports show. Even as the losses mounted
in 2001, most companies weren't concerned about pension deficits, Inman says.

In December 2001, billionaire investor Warren Buffett started to caution
companies that pension losses had the potential to cause huge disparities if
companies didn't address the issue. He began suggesting in public statements
that companies should lower annual pension income estimates to 6.5 percent, as
he did with his Berkshire Hathaway Inc.

Buffett's cautions went largely unheeded in 2002, as most companies kept
pension gain estimates at about 9.5 percent, SEC filings show. ``Generally,
people don't think this is an issue,'' says UBS Warburg's Bianco. ``They think
it's a bunch of balance sheet hocus-pocus. They don't know how to deal with
it.''

Lowered Rates

Some companies have already lowered their estimated rates. In July, Marsh &
McLennan Cos., an insurance and money management firm, lowered its assumed
rates of return to 9.25 percent from 10 percent; in November, Georgia-Pacific
said it would lower its expected rate to 8.5 percent in 2003 from 9.5 percent.

Those rates are still far too high, says Joshua Dietch, a consultant at Cerulli
Associates, a Boston-based financial research and consulting firm. ``Companies
got caught with their pants down using high assumptions,'' he says.

An examination of company filings with the SEC, comparing balance sheet
earnings reporting with numbers found in complex footnotes deeper in the
reports, shows how reported income can be distorted by including pension fund
investment returns that never materialized.

Weyerhaeuser Co., the world's biggest lumber company, relied on reported
pension earnings for 66 percent of its net income in 2001: $234 million out of
$354 million. The company used an 11 percent assumed rate of return in 2001 --
one of the highest of any company in the S&P 500, according to CSFB and UBS
Warburg.

Lost 9.5 Percent

Its pension fund actually lost 9.5 percent on its investments. The estimated
pension fund investment income before expenses was $437 million, while the
pension fund lost $412 million.

Weyerhaeuser achieved an 18 percent actual rate of return over the 17 years
through 2001 by taking on slightly more risk than other pension funds, says
Richard Taggart, the company's vice president of finance. That included $47
million invested in LJM2 LP, the now bankrupt special-purpose entity formed in
1999 by Andrew Fastow, Enron Corp.'s former chief financial officer.

Initially, LJM2 produced an internal rate of return of more than 40 percent,
says Robert McCullough of McCollough Research Associates in Portland, Oregon.
Taggart says the investment in LJM2 was written off in 2001 for a loss of less
than $5 million.

Lower Returns

In November, Weyerhaeuser said it would reduce shareholder equity by $90
million in the fourth quarter because of lower investment returns on its
pension funds. Weyerhaeuser dropped its expected rate of return to 10.5 percent
in 2002, and company officials say another decline seems likely in 2003.

``It's not unreasonable to assume we might do that, considering where the
financial markets have gone,'' says Taggart.

SBC didn't lower the expected rate of return on its pension fund during the
market decline of 2001. Instead, it increased the estimated rate to 9.5 percent
from 8.5 percent in 2000. By doing so, the phone company was able to add $360
million to its earnings for 2001. That change is permitted under FASB
standards.

``I can't think of a rational reason for it,'' says Siegel of the Center for
Financial Research & Analysis. ``The vast majority of pension plans lowered or
left unchanged rates of return in 2001.''

High Historical Rates

Inman says the rate was raised because of the pension fund's high historical
rates of return and bullish expectations for the future. ``I've never ever
encountered a discussion, `How can we do this to make our earnings appear
stronger than they are?''' he says.

SBC's $40.8 billion pension fund lost 6.9 percent, or $2.8 billion, in 2001,
while the expected return reflected in its pension footnote was $3.5 billion.
The company reported net income of $7.24 billion in 2001; the total included
$1.45 billion in assumed gains from its pension fund.

SBC didn't mention the pension fund's contribution to earnings in any of its
press releases through 2001 or in the management discussion section of its
annual report filed with the SEC on Feb. 28, in which the company did note the
increase in the expected rate of return.

Inman says he favors improving the disclosure of pension income on corporate
earnings. ``I'm not sure the bulk of the public has any understanding at all on
the issue of rate of return that you're projecting and what impact that's going
to have on your earnings or absence of earnings,'' he says.

Weak Stock Market

In November, in an SEC filing, SBC cautioned investors that a continuing weak
stock market could cause the company to lower its estimated pension rate of
return.

Companies with the biggest pension fund disparities are large manufacturers
with unionized workforces. Hardest hit are the auto, airplane and steel
industries, CSFB and UBS Warburg say.

General Motors said in October that by the end of 2002, its U.S. pension plan
could be underfunded by $23 billion. Pension plans are considered underfunded
when pension fund obligations exceed the value of the fund's assets.

GM's pension fund covers about 650,000 active and retired U.S. workers. GM
estimated in November it would have to add to its pension plan $14 billion to
$17 billion if the company earns less than 10 percent on its pension fund
investments every year through 2006.

If GM doesn't reach those funding levels, the company says, it will have to pay
higher premiums to the PBGC. The premiums could increase by as much as $207
million a year if the underfunding is $23 billion in 2004, based on standards
set by the PBGC.

`A Manageable Situation'

``We didn't get ourselves into this hole in one day and we're not going to get
out right away, but we do believe this is a manageable situation,'' says GM
spokesman Jerry Dubrowski.

Ford said in its 2001 annual report, filed with the SEC on March 28, that it
expected its U.S. pension funds to earn 9.5 percent in 2002. In November, Ford
said in a press release that it had lost 11.5 percent on its U.S. pension funds
during the first nine months of 2002. The automaker said its pension funds
would be underfunded by about $6.2 billion at year-end.

``Overall, the company believes its pension obligations are very manageable,''
the company said.

Omitted from Ford's press release was any reference to its foreign pension fund
investments. An estimate in an appendix to the company's quarterly filing with
the SEC in November predicted an additional $5.7 billion year-end loss for the
foreign pension funds, for a total underfunding of $11.9 billion -- about 67
percent of the market value of Ford shares.

Investors Bewildered

Citing pension investment gains as part of company earnings leaves many
investors bewildered, says Dennis Beresford, former chairman of FASB and now a
professor of accounting at the University of Georgia.

``The mere notion of pension income is counterintuitive,'' Beresford says.
Pension income doesn't belong to a company, he says. A company holds pension
money in trust for its employees. Companies aren't allowed to use the funds to
pay dividends or buy machinery, he says.

``Someone who wanted to could purposely choose bad assumptions to manipulate
financial results,'' he adds.

That can no longer happen in the United Kingdom, where the smoothing concept
central to FAS 87 has been scrapped. In November 2000, the U.K.'s Accounting
Standards Board approved a new rule to replace smoothed pension asset values
with actual market prices.

`Impenetrable Black Box'

``Pension cost accounting has for a long time been an impenetrable black box,''
says David Tweedie, a native of Scotland who now heads the International
Accounting Standards Board in London, which is pushing for worldwide
regulations similar to those in the U.K. ``In my view, the U.K. now has the
best standard in the world.''

The U.S., too, should adopt a standard that reflects actual market value of
pension assets, says Walter Schuetze, chief accountant at the SEC from 1992 to
1995. He says companies should update the performance of pension fund
investments four times a year.

Lucas, the project manager of FAS 87, agrees that it's time for a new rule to
clear up investor confusion. Lucas, who's now a consultant, suggests that
pension income and expenses be listed and identified clearly in income
statements. He'd also eliminate assumed rates of return and use actual pension
earnings to replace artificial smoothing techniques.

Patrick Durbin, an FASB practice fellow, says the accounting board isn't
working on any changes to FAS 87. ``There isn't anything on the FASB agenda to
reconsider the rule,'' he says.

Lucas says the current system will likely stay the same for now because U.S.
companies contend the smoothing concept reduces earnings volatility quarter to
quarter. ``Accounting makes progress in small steps,'' he says.

So companies will continue to report earnings that don't match up to reality --
and many investors will continue to base their decisions on numbers they have
no reason to trust.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:12/30/2002 1:14:29 PM
From:Baldur Fjvlnisson
GM is probably technically bankrupt already.

Its retiree benefit plans, including pensions and health care, have unfunded
liabilities of a rather whopping 60 billion dollars. That is up from 30 billion
in 1999.
Some of that shows up in liabilities on the balance sheet
but about 11 billion does not.

There are HUGE pension plan holes out there.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:12/30/2002 1:17:20 PM
From:Softechie
In general people don't realize these holes until they're shown in the lights
and then it's too late...very sad...Da Crooks always win...
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:12/30/2002 1:27:55 PM
From:Baldur Fjvlnisson
Don't worry, as you know the SEC and other entities

pretending to "regulate" this fraud driven mess take
action when the maximum number of suckers has been
drawn into these scams.

Their Wall St. owners screw the public and its pension funds to the tune of
zillions upon zillions and then get a slap on the wrist as you see.

Three trillion in off balance sheet debt, huge holes in pension plans,
countless Nasdaq stock watering scams with sales of $1-5 per watered down
share, executives being rewarded for fraud and criminality, mob owned police,
states going belly up, labor pool contracting with real interest rates at zero,
the world drowning in overcapacity, totally irresponsible nutcases in charge of
this whole mess, WW3 a distinct possibility if it hasn't already started...I
think we can look forward to many many enjoyable moons of this bear market. I
just wish that dam bear really wakes up next year. It hasn't really got going
yet.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:12/30/2002 1:31:49 PM
From:Softechie
You should enjoy this article from Zeal LLC...I am!

http://www.zealllc.com/2002/bustrev.htm
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:12/30/2002 1:33:57 PM
From:Baldur Fjvlnisson
I love Zeal. In the spring of 2001 I was spamming its

material extensively on message boards. Great stuff.

Do re-read JPM's derivatives monster. It's another
masterpiece.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:12/30/2002 1:35:24 PM
From:Baldur Fjvlnisson
INTERVIEW WITH DR. KURT RICHEBACHER

Late December 2002

http://www.investmentrarities.com/12-2002late.html
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:12/30/2002 2:54:36 PM
From:Allen Furlan
Timba I found your posts on Armstrong quite interesting. I think the
exploration of alternative value strategies to be valuable options to more
"pure" value investing. Also I have looked forward to your posts and encourage
you to continue.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:12/30/2002 3:42:29 PM
From:Spekulatius
Timbabear,
i found your discussion of Armstrong very interesting. your earlier
contributions (in particular the discussion regarding DELL) has added
tremendous value to this thread. Please don't leave!
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:12/30/2002 4:02:10 PM
From:Bob Rudd
Stock Watcher: MIMS tweaked my interest [I already have SGR & PLCM] with what
looks like value multiples on cash flow, but, as so often happens I've found
some issues. Herb Greenberg has written extensively on MIMS disclosure
problems, earnings quality....which goes a long way towards explaining the high
short interest and recent weakness. Since I haven't done well betting against
Herb, I'll probably stay away.
Unfortunately, MIMS is frustratingly typical of what I'm finding: Seems nearly
every rock I turn over has a snake or two under it...sometimes obvious,
sometimes requiring a bit of digging...but there nonetheless. I'm not sure
whether it's because there are few really compelling values or I've just gotten
better spotting snakes.
Thanks for posting the list.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:12/30/2002 4:14:51 PM
From:Spekulatius
I have been doing some Xmas shopping for stocks recently. My picks:
DCX: trading for market cap to revenue ratios unseen. Chrysler seems to be
turning around. Other businesses Freightliner and Airbus doing reasonably well
in a very difficult environment. Mercedes is a cash cow as usual.
Trading below book. This is a chance to pick up a stock at a cyclical low, IMO.
Negatives: Chrysler pension liability.

ING: This Dutch financial conglomerate has been discussed here before. Low PE
(8) and high yield (5.5%). The recent secondary has boosted the capital ratio
somewhat. This company has been around for a while and is very solid.

GER. Germany closed end fund buys the German blue chips at 14% discount.
Jawohl!
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:12/30/2002 4:23:04 PM
From:Don Earl
Scott,

Interesting topic, and I think a good one. There are pros and cons on anything,
and I feel a lot of times it comes down to each individual investors goals,
tolerance for risk, etc. Some of my observations are as follows, are not
intended to be investment advice, and are not intended to be critical of other
styles of investing. All in my opinion, since my opinion is the only one I have
to express.

For starters, I don't think it's practical for a private investor to attempt to
duplicate the strategies of professional money managers. It costs me about $20
per trade on limit orders, so the round trip is $40. If I split up my account
in 100 stocks, the cost for the round trip on my portfolio would be $4000. If a
person had $200K to work with, that means you'd have to make up 2% on
commission alone before trying to make up the spread just to break even. On the
flip side, if a person is holding the position for many years, the average cost
per year would be minimal.

The biggest consideration, in my opinion, is that a private investor just plain
doesn't have the time to do justice to solid DD on 100 issues, not to mention
you'd likely have to look at 500 companies to find 100 that might look
promising. To make matters worse, securities regulation and oversight are close
to nonexistent, and GAAP is a joke, so there is no way to make apples to apples
comparisons from company to company and sector to sector without taking the
time to do some serious numbers crunching by digging through the filings. To be
honest, I doubt most money managers go to the trouble they probably should in
that respect.

Another consideration is it is next to impossible to beat the market with a
diversified portfolio. You'll generally match the overall market's performance
over an extended period of time. If the market is up, your portfolio will be
up. If the market is down, your portfolio will be down. Diversification is a
hedging strategy, but there is a break point where being overly hedged
eliminates any possibility of turning a profit. The other side of the coin is
the less you hedge, the more market risk you accept.

On a more concentrated portfolio, my view is it's the strategy that has to be
diversified. I rarely have more than 5 positions in my account at any given
time, and I treat cash as one of my positions. Cash is my hedge and it may be
the only position I hold depending on market conditions. I don't consider
myself to be a day trader, but I do use a lot of day trading type strategies in
what I do. I try to identify situations where most of the downside has been
taken out, and the upside has been maximized. I'm normally looking for places
where my goal is to take profits in 3 months or less, and my average holding
time is probably more like 3-4 weeks. I tend to use both tight stops and cost
averaging depending on how the trades looks at any given time. I try to use
both under valued and over valued as my price targets and treat a good value on
put options the same as a good value on a long stock position. I'll
occasionally use index options on timing market events, or try to identify
individual issues I consider to be representative of general market conditions
or sectors. I like volatility, but not at the level likely to attract day
traders, which usually means small/mid caps in the 300K share volume a day
range. I like debt to tangible assets at less than .2 to 1, strong liquidity,
positive growth, and limited cash burn. I like places where EPS is slightly
negative to break even, and the trend is toward profitability, and I try to buy
as close to the bottom of the chart and as close to (below?) book value as I
can get. And I probably spend at least 3 times more time on researching the
market and the economy as I do researching all individual issues combined.

I know it's not Graham or Buffet, but it's what I seem to be most happy with,
and I've had a great year while most diversified portfolios have gotten
clobbered. I am NOT recommending this as the ideal was to manage a more
concentrated portfolio, or even recommending a more concentrated portfolio.
It's what I have enough time, energy, money, tolerance for risk and experience
to target at this point in time.

Hopefully you'll get some feedback on both sides of the pros and cons, and
anyone who wants to point out some of the risks involved in any of the above is
welcome to do so.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:12/30/2002 7:09:35 PM
From:Stock Watcher
Bob...I'm glad to hear we're in agreement on SGR & PLCM. On MIMS, it appears
that Herb Greenberg's allegations are old news about 'fuzzy cash-flow' which
became his own personal crusade in May of this year:

http://biz.yahoo.com/tsp/020517/10023056_1.html

Since then it appears the company has continued to concentrate on growing it's
business and Mr. Greenberg seems to have been silenced for over 6 months. The
company, however, did pay a hefty price for an appearance of impropriety which
the SEC has not found interesting enough to investigate.

In the meantime, CIBC initiated coverage at the end of October, and the news of
12/20/02 with HIG is very encouraging:
http://biz.yahoo.com/prnews/021220/nef015_1.html

MIMS has a healthy financial statement (11/23/02:
http://biz.yahoo.com/fin/l/m/mims.html) , a new President
(http://biz.yahoo.com/djus/021202/0904000294_1.html), and a 22% increase in 3rd
Quarter net rev's: http://biz.yahoo.com/bw/021025/252087_1.html) . This stock
has all the makings of a true 'bottom fish' with a PE of 8.

Also, there haven't been any insider sales since June which is a very bullish
sign. However, the new Pres. bought stock in June at over $11 and I'm sure he'd
like to recoup his paper losses.

The most bullish sign of all is the 20% short position which must be based on
Greenberg's old story from May. The shorts will bail-out soon since they've
driven the stock down into the $5 range (also tax-selling hasn't helped the
price either). Even with an accounting irregularity, the stock is worth more
than $5. I just don't see much downside potential from here, but I do see
short-squeeze potential.

Meanwhile, I'm looking for $10 by March 03'....the shorts will be gone by then
imo...good luck ! neil
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:12/30/2002 10:59:51 PM
From:James Clarke
Great post, Don. Everybody does this differently.

I've found myself that the more confident I get that I know how to do this, the
less valuable I find diversification. There are two or three stocks I find each
year, but only two or three, that I am absolutely sure of. And 9 out of 10 of
those work - I've learned to identify that "spider sense" and what it feels
like when I know I've got one. And I've learned to buy those big. Big meaning
10-20% of a total portfolio. When I buy less than that I almost always wind up
regretting it, thus turning a success into an error.

The danger to this without experience is that EVERY stock you buy feels like
the perfect pitch at the time you are buying it. After a while I've learned to
keep myself busy with small positions while waiting for that perfect pitch
feeling about something.

I usually own about 20 stocks at a time personally. But they have VERY
different weightings. Its taken me a long time to get to the point where I am
comfortable identifying the sure things and putting 15% of my money into them -
I wasn't there two years ago.

So my risk management strategy becomes very simple but chillingly precise -
don't be wrong on one of these big bets. And you know what these sure things
usually are - they're a stock I was early on and am down 25 or 30% or even 50%
in - it is extremely hard to make something like that a big bet, but
occasionally you've got to do it if you want to make significantly above market
returns. But you can't be wrong - averaging down like that is a recipe for
disaster if your analysis is in error. (I will almost never do this if a
company has debt.)

Of course I am not allowed to do that professionally. Professionals (aside from
hedge funds) are generally required to own at least 50 stocks, maybe more, with
no more than 3 or 5% in each position. That cuts down on risk if you've got a
manager who doesn't know what they're doing, but cuts down on reward if you've
got one that does know what they're doing. I try to use weighting as a primary
weapon professionally too, but there are all kinds of contraints, so I'm kind
of limited to is this going to be a 3% weighting or a 1% weighting.

If you're looking for a good mutual fund, look for the kind of manager who has
a great track record and owns 10 or 15% positions occasionally. Longleaf for
example. What you don't want is a portfolio whose top 10 positions make up 10%
of the fund - just buy the index.

Whoever suggested this topic for discussion, thanks, its been very fruitful
already. I want to hear from Paul Senior on this before its done. Paul, is
there a stock you don't own? What is a large weighting for you? What are the
merits of that diversification vs. its downside in your view?
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:12/31/2002 12:46:56 AM
From:Marc Fortier
Interesting point of view James. I know what you're talking about when you
refer to that "spider sense". I have felt it with GBT.a (TSE) and DCI. I
studied both stocks closely and did not hesitate to average down. It was a wise
decision in both cases so far.

As I said before, I think it is prudent policy to cash in some of the profits
when a position has grown to a dangerous level. Even the best companies hit
some bumps, and sometimes it's very difficult to forecast when it will happen.
It's better to err on the safe side than be sorry IMO.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:12/31/2002 4:27:39 AM
From:Don Earl
James,

I enjoyed your comments also. I always find it interesting to see how other
investors approach the market. Maybe most interesting is how after an investor
has had a chance to make most of the usual mistakes, some kind of a system
seems to form out of the ashes. The things that work go into the bag of tricks
and the things that don't work go into the avoid pile. The bag of tricks will
vary from investor to investor, but it's interesting to see how often they
overlap in a lot of the same places, and the avoid piles start looking an awful
lot alike. The baby gets thrown out with the bath water once in awhile, but the
odds improve. Good luck to everyone in 2003.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:12/31/2002 9:58:09 AM
From:Stock Watcher
*another Fav to watch is INVN , PE:8:
http://www.marketwatch.com/news/yhoo/story.asp?source=blq/yhoo&siteid=yhoo&dist
yhoo&guid=%7B04E1F466%2D9221%2D4F43%2DA11E%2DBE7D4348E171%7D
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:12/31/2002 2:44:54 PM
From:Paul Senior
Yes, I'm a very strong believer in maintaining diversified portfolios. I am
keeping at least 100 companies in my largest portfolio.

I often take positions in downtrodden sectors. And, as I've mentioned before,
because my history has shown I don't do well in defining or determining what
will be the "best" stock going forward in a sector, I often try to take
positions in several stocks within the sector. My intent and hope is that at
least most of the sector recovers, and that by diversifying within the
beat-down sector, I have reduced the business and market risk that would've
been entailed by picking just one company in it. As examples of this tactic, I
have mentioned many stocks I own in retail clothing, in retail auto
dealerships, in defense, in restaurants, in grocery stories, in insurance, in
oil, and so on.
My point here, is that for me, it's not about which particular stock is my
largest position, but which sector is. A sector drop can affects me more than a
stock drop. (Although some stock drops do result large and permanent pain.)

I also like to diversify within niches. That would include having stocks which
fit a dividend model which I occasionally mention, having net-net plays, and
recently, several below-cash stocks. In net-net stocks, I try to follow the
Graham model and buy a package of them -- when I can find any at all. (We've
talked about how that differs from and seems less successful than your rifle
approach to net-nets which adds a further judgmental screen.)

Possibly money is the biggest factor in diversification: one has to have enough
money to diversify if one is not buying mutual funds. TIME is the second
biggest element in considering diversification, imo.

I see value stocks as problem companies. Time is generally required to overcome
those problems, and time is usually necessary for such progress to be
recognized in the market. So I am buying value stocks now for their hoped-for
progress and recovery 18-24 months out. Similarly, come 2003, I am planning and
hoping to sell stocks bought 2001 or earlier. A cycle of planting, weeding,
harvesting. In other words, I want to have a goodly number of stocks moving
through each of these phases.

Other than the continuation of the bear market, I see no reason why owning the
"best" 100-150 stocks I can find shouldn't allow me to show very good profits
over a market cycle, and maybe even beat the market averages occasionally.

It seems to me posters on S.I often practice what appears to me to be some sort
of combined concentration and diversification. Which is something like never
owning more that a few stocks at once (say at most, 10-15), but completely
turning the entire portfolio over one or more times during the year; or
sometimes that's buying and selling the same stock several times or buying then
selling different stocks while maintaining a "core" position of one or two or
three stocks. To me, that mostly seems like trading (vs. investing) and where I
don't see academic support or well-known, successful adherents.

jmo

Paul Senior
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:12/31/2002 5:15:49 PM
From:Dave
why?
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:12/31/2002 5:31:30 PM
From:Stock Watcher
Dave: on INVN very bullish outlook for 03': "Shares in InVision Technologies
(INVN: news, chart, profile) rose $4.44, or 19 percent, to close at $27.41
after the maker of explosives detection equipment raised its targets for
fourth-quarter profits and sales. InVision cited higher equipment demand from
the U.S. government.

The company has continued to benefit from greater demand for bomb detection
equipment, especially at airports, since the Sept. 11 terrorist attacks.

"Going forward, we anticipate that airports throughout the country will
implement plans to integrate baggage screening equipment into the baggage
handling systems, which we foresee will improve security, passenger convenience
and throughput," the company said in a statement.

Management said it expects fourth-quarter earnings of at least $1.60 a share,
on sales of at least $160 million. Analysts polled by Thomson First Call had
expected the company to earn $1.38 a share, on sales of about $144 million.

InVision left unchanged its 2003 earnings and sales targets. Analysts expect
earnings of $3.33 a share next year, on sales of about $406 million.

Mike Tarsala is a San Francisco-based reporter for CBS.MarketWatch.com.
12/16/02"

PE:11, cash: $112M cash, 31% short position

"INVN develops, manufactures, markets and supports an explosive detection
system for civil aviation security based on advanced CT Tech. For the nine
months ended 9/29/02, revenues totaled $218.7 million, up from $51.3 million.
Net income totaled $33.9 million, up from $680 thousand. Revenues reflect
increased systems and related accessories orders from the FAA and TSA. Higher
income also reflects a more favorable sales mix and improved manufacturing
efficiencies."

chart ascending:
http://finance.yahoo.com/q?s=INVN&d=c&k=c1&a=v&p=s&t=my&l=on&z=m&q=l

"On Monday, the bomb-detection company's stock jumped 19.3% to $27.41 after
InVision raised its profit outlook for the fourth quarter to $1.60 a share
thanks to increased demand for its explosive-detection system, or EDS. Back in
October management told Wall Street to look for earnings closer to $1.30 a
share.

InVision's top line should also expand. The Newark, Calif., security outfit
upped its revenue projection for the final quarter of the year to $160 million
from the $140 million it forecast back in October. Meeting the target would
represent an impressive 37% increase over third-quarter levels.

Looking ahead to 2003, management reiterated its expectation of $400 million in
sales based on its current backlog and anticipated new orders. While the
federal government has mandated explosive-detection screening at all airports,
InVision said an extension of the deadline to get these systems in place could
affect the timing of order deliveries.

InVision, one of the biggest corporate beneficiaries of the war on terrorism,
has seen its stock rise 784% since the Sept. 11 attacks. The company makes a
Federal Aviation Administration-certified explosives-detection system that
supports the Transportation Security Administration's mandate to improve
security throughout the nation's 429 commercial airports. In addition, InVision
plans to introduce next year a prototype for a new hybrid system that
significantly reduces the number of false positives rendered by existing
technology. 12/16/02"
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:12/31/2002 6:38:31 PM
From:Dave
The problem with INVN is that they have explosive growth but it is uncertain
whether revenues will remain constant in future years. Invision is more of a
"growth" or "momentum" play than a "value" play.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:12/31/2002 7:13:11 PM
From:Stock Watcher
....and I just saw their bomb-detection equipment on NBC Nightly news...with a
PE of 11, I see value here...regards,sw
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:12/31/2002 10:25:39 PM
From:Steve168
Don, good strategy. I have been trying to do the same thing. What do you long
or short now? or close to a buy/sell?

Thanks, Steve
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:12/31/2002 11:27:00 PM
From:TimbaBear
To the Thread:

I am humbled and grateful for the support, both public and private, that I've
gotten. The posts that urged me to stay were most unexpected and deeply
appreciated.

I want to thank Joan Graffius, Advalorem, ScottMc, Allen Furlan, Spekulatius
and the several private message posters for your kind words and encouragement.

I have had an extremely challenging year filled with deaths and a seemingly
endless string of other major negative crises, and perhaps I was just showing
the wear and tear of it all.

I have reviewed the posts leading up to me wanting to leave the thread and can
find no "smoking gun", so it was me and my reactions rather than responses. I
hope to be more objective going forward, but it may take a while as the
batteries are not yet recharged.

Thank you all for your kindness and patience.

Timbabear
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/1/2003 1:05:51 AM
From:Scott Mc
TimbaBear,
I am sorry that you have had an extremely challenging year, I hope I do not say
anything that you will take the wrong way, it is a new year and I hope we all
have a great 2003, I will be 53 this year and being born in 1950 I always
looked to the year 2000 (when I would be 50) as being so far in the future(even
when I was 11 and 12). As the year approached it became a very significant
year, both for me turning 50 and the year 2000. I can say I survived both and
now a bit surprised to notice that it is 2003 and I will be 53, I have put down
some new years resolutions which I hope to keep. One of these associated with
stocks is that I will keep a minimum position of $15K in all stocks which will
force me to be a bit more concentrated.

To all, Lets have a GREAT 2003.....

Scott
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/1/2003 8:10:49 AM
From:Dave
StockWatcher,

Again, there are tremendous differences between "growth" and "value".

Invision is not a "value" stock since one believes revenues will grow
substantially in the next year or two. However, what will happen in year three?
Will revenues continue to grow? stabilize? decline?

Invision is a classic case where a P/E ratio is not a good estimator of value.
While Graham believes that anyone who looks into the future is "speculating",
you should realize that building a DCF model on Invision will tell you what its
worth.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/1/2003 10:52:35 AM
From:TimbaBear
Bob Rudd

Timba: If I read you correctly, you're primarily expressing preference for a
yield over a multiple...and comparing that yield, cash flow yield, to
normalized CD rates. A yield, of course, is simply the reciprocal of a multiple
- 6% is the same as 16.7 multiple. A matter of personal preference without much
real difference, methinks.

Yes, the concept can be expressed as either a yield or it's inverse, a
multiple. Since I've set up spreadsheets to assist with the calculations, I
prefer yield for this one. At the inverse, a P/FCF of under 8 becomes
interesting to me, but under 4 really grabs my attention.

When I look more deeply into a company, I also look at Interest Coverage,
NetNet value, history of good performance, the pattern of recent performance,
ESOP usage, shareholder participation in the growth (dividends, net share
reductions, etc), "one-time" write offs, debt levels and current ratio.

Timba
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/1/2003 11:18:46 AM
From:TimbaBear
Hi Scott

"...I have put down some new years resolutions which I hope to keep. One of
these associated with stocks is that I will keep a minimum position of $15K in
all stocks which will force me to be a bit more concentrated."

Well, I presume that your account has more than 15K in it, and that your
selection of the stocks will be prudent.

I don't have any hard and fast rules for my portfolio allocation. But lately
I've been evolving toward James Clarke's position for his personal accounts.

When I find a company that has passed all my levels of analysis, I find that I
do a final "reality" check on myself. Have I been objective in the analysis,
whether or not I've been passionate in the defense of that analysis is relevant
only in that the more passionate the defense, perhaps the more dispassionate I
need in answering the question of objective analysis. If I have no unusual
reservations about my methodology, I am willing to take on a position
proportional to the discount to value that I have uncovered.

As far as diversification is concerned, I find that the hunt for value takes me
all over the place. Bonds, Dividend-payers, large cap, mid cap, small cap,
bankrupt, various industries and sectors. The limit to the areas of discovery
is usually me. I just don't have the time to learn as much as I want to about
all areas, or I just develop an attitude about an area that prevents me from
any search for value in that area (Banks and Insurance companies come to mind).
But even so, I don't find that diversification is any sort of problem
whatsoever when I employ a value approach to the selection process.

When I use other methodologies like momentum plays using moving average
cross-overs or other technical analysis techniques, then diversification needs
to be more of a concern as whole industries seem to move like a herd. In this
kind of a market though, I don't use TA for the long positions.

Timba
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/1/2003 6:02:06 PM
From:Stock Watcher
Dave...

just out on INVN:
http://www.marketwatch.com/news/yhoo/story.asp?source=blq/yhoo&siteid=yhoo&dist
yhoo&guid=%7B6C4E9F75%2DB08B%2D42DA%2DB5AB%2D94088CBD2BB0%7D

I still don't see how we can project future revenues for INVN since it's in an
industry that is "exploding". They also have a huge backlog of orders which
puts them in the "growth" category imo...

with (1) strong buy rec. & (3) buy rec's...I'll take my chances:
http://biz.yahoo.com/z/a/i/invn.html

I see what you mean about projected EPS growth, but it seems that most
companies are down-playing futures rev's....meanwhile, this year looks
extremely healthy with a projected EPS of $3.55...I wouldn't bet against this
freight train - it's about to become a gravy train imo...regards, sw
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/1/2003 6:09:53 PM
From:Don Earl
Steve,

At present, I'm mostly cash with one small long position and one small short
position. In other words, I'm mainly in hedging mode right now. My take is 2003
will be a continuation of 2002 and most of the market will retest and break
through the October lows over the next several months. For a short pick, pull
any low PE, high debt S&P 500 company out of a hat, and buy some cheap,
slightly out of the money puts with expiration dates around April-June. For a
long play, pick any low debt, high cash, beat up tech that you wouldn't mind
averaging down on, because that's probably what you'll end up doing. If it
works, I'll take profits on the options to average into the long position
sometime around late February. If it doesn't work, hopefully there'll be enough
time value left in the options to salvage something on a stop and the long
position will be up enough to pick up the slack. The cash stays in reserve to
target unusual market events and gives me something to work with in case I goof
in both directions. The tickers don't really matter since I'm mostly just
dinking around waiting for something to happen, and am feeling sort of wishy
washy about my ability to make a clean call in the current market.

I'm a fairly opinionated individual, which shouldn't be confused with being
equal to being a stock market guru. Most days what I do would probably only
make sense to crazy people, which is fine with me since I figure anyone playing
this market has to be half crazy anyhow. Good luck and Happy New Year to all.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/1/2003 8:45:17 PM
From:Dave
There are tremenous differences between "value stocks" and "growth stocks".
Invision falls in the latter category.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/1/2003 9:54:12 PM
From:Steve168
I bought some ALVR because it is under cash value with no debt. It is in a
battered down industry - wireless access. What do you think? Is this a good
value play? Any comments are welcome. Happy New Year to all!
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/1/2003 11:17:40 PM
From:James Clarke
I got through another 200 pages of Graham 1940 edition of Security Analysis on
my day off today - almost done. There are long sections of boring or dated
material, but pearls of wisdom abound. Some utterly brilliant analysis,
thoroughly refuting modern portfolio theory twenty five years before anybody
had even thought of "market efficiency" or a mathematical tradeoff between risk
and reward based on standard deviations of volatility.

Most surprising about the book is that much of it could have been written
yesterday if you just changed the dates and the name of the companies. His
description of the bubble of the late 20s is almost exactly like what we just
saw in the late 90s - the parallels are almost exact, except the one we saw in
the late 90s went twice as high. (At the peak we had the LARGEST stock on the
market, Cisco, trading at well over 100x earnings - the examples Graham cited
from the pre-Crash bubble were 40-50x, much like the level the Nifty Fifty got
to in the 70s.) Reading the early Graham texts really puts what we just saw
into historical perpective - there is no historical perspective except maybe
Japan - the 1990s bubble was far worse than anything Graham could have
imagined.

There are five editions of Security Analysis, four of which Graham wrote. The
first two have now been republished, I got my paws on the fourth just long
enough to Xerox it two years ago. And when I woke up on my birthday a couple
weeks ago my wife handed me the Third edition which she found on EBay. I don't
want to know what she paid for it, but it finishes out the collection.

If you haven't read either the first or second editions that have been
republished in the last couple years you're missing out on some great learning
opporunities. One or the other is probably sufficient - I loved the first, but
Buffett has always said the second is the best. Its hard to compare them
because I forget the details of the first edition, but the second is 10 years
after the crash after a lot had happened to test his ideas. The examples of
what happened in the 30s are just amazing. For example, would you believe that
in 1932 40% of listed securities at some point traded below net working
capital?

My advice if you're going to read this intimidating volume is get through the
first 100 pages or so - you'll enjoy them - a brilliant analysis of bond
investing which sets up the idea of "don't lose money". After those 100 pages
it will start to get boring (unless you're even weirder than I am) - don't give
up, just skip large sections that seem boring or dated, or even better, just
skip to page 350 or so where he gets into analysis of common stocks. The second
half of the book on common stocks is a beautiful read, though there are
sections of that to skip too when things get boring or dated. The book is not
as long as it looks if you skip the esoteria.

Happy New Year to all. I'm as fully invested as I've been since March 2000 (the
bottom for value stocks, peak for techs) with a handful of positions I am very
happy to own large amounts of. Though I'm not calling any bottoms or anything -
if January is big I'll be right back to 30% cash.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/2/2003 12:45:29 AM
From:Don Earl
Steve,

ALVR is one I looked at about a year and a half ago when it turned up on a
screen I ran. I don't recall the details, and although it would have been a
good trade at the time, I talked myself out of it. I usually stay away from off
shore companies, mainly because they're a lot harder to research due to
different filing requirements. I'm not an expert on tele communications stocks,
but casual observation suggests to me we're at least several years away from
any kind of turnaround. You might want to get some second or third opinions on
that point. I'm not sure about the timing, but it might be a good value. As a
suggestion, it may be worthwhile to contact their investor relations department
and see if they have an information packet available with some financial
reports. There isn't enough information on the SEC website to make a good call,
but I did notice a tender offer filing without any details attached. I'd
definitely want to find out what that is about before making any kind of
decision.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/2/2003 12:05:05 PM
From:Jurgis Bekepuris
In regards of diversification, I will be beating my personal horse: mutual
funds + stock investing. :-)

I don't know about the circumstances of other people, but for me quite a large
percentage of investment dollars is in 401(k), which does not allow stock
investing. So even if I wanted to concentrate my positions, XX% of my portfolio
has to stay in mutual funds - S&P500, value funds, etc.

Considering the above, I don't see a point of having more than 10-15 positions
in my active accounts. Lately, I don't even have enough time for these 10-15
positions, so the number may decline even lower. If I sell existing positions
and don't have time or ideas for new ones, I would probably buy selected mutual
funds.

Jurgis
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/2/2003 12:29:14 PM
From:Larry S.
My experience with 401-K is the selection of funds are quite poor. Most seem to
concentrate in sector indexes from Vanguard or Fidelity, with representative
large cap growth and/or value funds thrown in. Granted, the last few years have
been particularly poor ones for the indexes, i prefer funds with managers who
have positive 3 year returns, even if down in 2002. larry
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/2/2003 12:50:38 PM
From:Jurgis Bekepuris
Larry,

With all the drawbacks of 401(k), not investing in it and investing instead in
taxable account is a recipe for underperformance. You lose the tax benefits and
company match, which combined add up to substantial percentage. I doubt many
people can beat 401(k) with benefits by buying stocks in a taxable account.

Jurgis
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/2/2003 1:07:28 PM
From:Bob Rudd
Timba: "At the inverse, a P/FCF of under 8 becomes interesting to me, but under
4 really grabs my attention" It does mine too, but after this year, it also
heightens concerns that there's a BIG UGLY lurking somewhere. Too good to be
true valuations are often like 'too good to be true' anything else.
I sincerely hope you will continue to actively participate in this board. Your
contributions have been second to none. Sometimes comments on a board like this
come off harsher than they were intended since the non-verbal cues that
contribute the majority of meaning to communication, are missing.
The best for the new year,
Bob
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/2/2003 1:21:32 PM
From:Larry S.
Please don't get me wrong, I am all in favor of contributing to a 401-K. I am
perturbed about the limited choices and poor performance. Then again, the
company has a fiduciary responsibility, which is relieved by offering index
funds. I am in the process of moving money from IRAs, SEP-IRAs, etc and
consolidating them in my self-directed IRA. I plan on investing that money in
mutual funds that have had superior performance over the past 3 years, and
dumping the dogs, particularly in Janus. larry
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/2/2003 2:04:43 PM
From:Jurgis Bekepuris
Larry,

I agree about limited choices. However, unless one changes jobs and rolls over
401(k) into IRA, there's nothing to be done about it.

Jurgis - not worth changing jobs, IMHO :-)
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/2/2003 4:32:19 PM
From:TimbaBear
Bob Rudd

"...Too good to be true valuations are often like 'too good to be true'
anything else. 

Couldn't agree more. However, sometimes the market gets quite irrational, hence
the search for value's promise of better than average returns for the prudent
investor.

Sometimes comments on a board like this come off harsher than they were
intended since the non-verbal cues that contribute the majority of meaning to
communication, are missing. 

I agree with this also. I resemble that remark! :~}

Again, I have resumed my "normal" activity on this board. The fault did not lie
with the posters or the postings here, but within myself. Self-appraisal isn't
always pleasant, but the resultant growth is an OK feeling.

Timba
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/2/2003 5:59:17 PM
From:TimbaBear
Update on ACKHQ

Sold 40% of my position today for a net gain of 57% before taxes.

I didn't expect the market to correct itself so quickly! Normally I don't like
to trade round-trip that quickly, but even Graham said he got out after an
increase of 40% or so, wasn't it?

Am keeping the other 60% of the holdings. One of the private posters indicated
that my reasoning on ACKHQ would only be considered valid if it played out the
way I outlined, so I figure I'll hold on to the rest just to see. If, however,
it hits .81/share before the Effective Date, I'll be out completely.

Used 100% of today's proceeds and bought FRD with it. I had sold them to buy
ACKHQ, so now I have more than the original amount even after the commissions.

Timba
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/2/2003 8:28:46 PM
From:Steve168
Thanks Don for your suggestions. They make sense. Do you have any stock trading
under cash without debt? Anyone else has such kind of stocks?
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/3/2003 11:13:59 AM
From:Scott Mc
You can take a look at these, I don't own any of them but were trading below
cash.

MLIN, TERN, NUFO and DITC
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/3/2003 12:14:25 PM
From:Paul Senior
Wallace Rivers, fwiw, I sold a little TMO today. Company prospects are still
good imo, but I want to trim back my position a little.

I'm using the proceeds to buy HD which is down today based on it's lowered
earnings forecast. I've suspected profit margins weren't sustainable at current
rate. I just hope that Don Earl's comments about insiders' dealings with the
company and HD's off-balance sheet and GAAP accounting ploys are reflected in
the stock. I suspect they are not. And now that the spotlight's on HD, maybe
further media reports will be forthcoming about these negative aspects (which
would drive the stock even lower, I'd guess).

Still, the company is a behemoth with financial resources to open 200
additional stores this year. Perhaps they are not so arrogant that they can't
learn from Lowe's and work on their customer service too.

http://biz.yahoo.com/rb/021219/retail_homedepot_2.html

aside: Nice move recently in your old pick of CMO. And I can't see anyone
calling those dividends skimpy.

http://finance.yahoo.com/q?s=tmo+hd+cmo&d=t
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/3/2003 1:44:41 PM
From:Wallace Rivers
I don't own CMO right now, the current move seems silly to me...most near term
gains will be largely taken out on the ex date for the special dividend. The
fact that the company is entering a totally new line of business gives me
pause, as well.

HD - well, I'd looked at it, and passed on this falling knife. I passed then
because my experience as a consumer was less than stellar. That is supposed to
be the company's current bugaboo, and that was confirmed by these in store
visits. I am passing now, because the company is now experiencing almost nil
growth; it could be argued that the PE, while certainly not what it once was,
is still too high for a company experiencing such slack growth.
I've never been to a Lowe's, but it does appear that they are stealing market
share from HD. Although LOW PE is higher than HD, there still appears to be
impressive growth potential for this company. For that reason, I have a lower
bid in on LOW on this "baby with the bath water" sell-off.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/3/2003 2:00:36 PM
From:Mark Marcellus
Re the HD off balance sheet stuff, I'm fairly well satisfied on that score.
When I add the current value of the operating leases in with debt, I still get
a liability/asset ratio of .41 as of the end of FY '01, which I consider
acceptable. There are plenty of issues to consider with this company, but IMO
the crucial ones are the operational issues, not the balance sheet (which I
consider a strong positive).

Re negative reports driving the price lower, the next catalyst for that will
probably be their analyst meeting on 1/17.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/3/2003 2:39:09 PM
From:Don Earl
Steve,

I'm not currently following any of the below cash plays. Awhile back there was
quite a bit of discussion along those lines, so hopefully you'll get some
feedback from others on the thread. I know Paul has mentioned a number of them
and might have some ideas. In spite of some of my recent comments on
diversification, the basket approach is probably the better strategy in that
area. (That's speculation on my part as I haven't actually tried it and tracked
the results.) The last time I was actively running screens looking for below
cash issues, what I seemed to be finding in most cases were failed IPOs with
alarming rates of cash burn. The other matches were what Paul refers to as
"cash looking for a business". Those cases are usually situations where the
company has liquidated most or all of their operations to focus on a different
market. Since the failed IPOs already have a track record of going no where,
and the cash looking for a business doesn't have a track record to project
forward from, it's hard to identify where the upside is on any particular
company. Over a period of time the winners should win big, but the losers will
probably eventually end up in Chapter 11. The amount of risk involved in making
a bad call with a concentrated portfolio over weight in this area becomes
excessive, IMO. I'd also venture to say it takes a minimum of 20 hours of
research per issue, once the list has been narrowed down, to get any kind of
feel for what the prospects are like for any given company. You basically have
to learn the product and service, learn the market conditions for the business,
and then try to think like a CEO to get a feel for how well the company is
executing, and if the strategy makes sense. I consider cash to be a critical
part of value, but by the time most stocks are trading below cash, the market
is saying the only thing the company has is cash and it isn't enough to make it
a good investment. With the beating the market has taken over the last several
years there's a better chance of finding something good along those lines, but
too large a discount to cash is likely to show up as a red flag more often than
it doesn't.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/3/2003 2:47:16 PM
From:Bob Rudd
Sold LATD @1.50 for a bit better than a 2x since 9/12 buy @ .71. There's a good
chance this continues to run, perhaps leading to a takeover [PLCM would be my
best guess]...but that's speculation. My reason for buying - selling at 1/2
cash with modest burn, has gone away, so now I have too.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/3/2003 3:01:03 PM
From:Bob Rudd
HD: I don't see a compelling case for it, despite the drop. Multiples aren't
attractive...
1/3/02 EV/(EBITDA-CAPEX)=(2350*21.3-3834.260)/(5270-3,393)=24.6
* EV/FCF (2350*21.3-3834.260)/(5,963.0-3,393)=18
[No adjustment made for lowered guidance]
...Given the issues:
* Service problems that will require more SG&A to improve
* New locations in less populated areas - lower sales, less efficient - Growth
is behind them due to saturation
* Lowes encroaching on HD areas that had minimal competition previously
* Nearing the end of the refi boom that fuels a lot of remodel purchasing
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/3/2003 4:38:24 PM
From:Mark Marcellus
Well, you've got smart people on both sides of this one. A lot of it depends on
how much you buy into the new management. Longtime HD veterans would argue
differently, but I think the current problems are a legacy of the old
management, who remained stuck in a 1980's style retail model for far too long.

SSS growth is definitely behind them, although there's still plenty of room for
the business to grow and earnings to increase. The balance sheet is strong,
cash flow is strong, and I expect that increases in some areas in SG&A will be
largely offset by cost savings in others. No question that this will be a tough
couple of years for HD, but I don't see a big downside at these levels.
Mediocre returns, maybe, if I've misjudged management, but not a KMart style
disaster unless I've REALLY misjudged management.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/3/2003 7:28:25 PM
From:Larry S.
HD is going to lose institutional support. That means there will be large
sellers and continued selling pressure, imo. HD is probably attractive in high
teens or low 20s, but i don't see any impetus for the stock to make any
significant moves. I think we are seeing an overbuilding of these stores, both
HD and LOW, which are cannabalizing existing business. the real losers will be
the small, independent hardward and lumber companies. larry
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/3/2003 7:58:23 PM
From:wolfdog2
the real losers will be the small, independent hardward and lumber companies.
larry

And the general public who will have to shop at hd.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/4/2003 12:01:14 AM
From:Scott Mc
Perhaps they are not so arrogant that they can't learn from Lowe's and work on
their customer service too.

What about Lowe's then? They were off today as well, why not buy them instead
of HD??

Disclaimer, I own a tiny position in Lowes from a dividend from my Eagle
Hardware(now there is a name from the past), after selling the Eagle.

Why sell these positions when the commission may be 20%+ the value?
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/4/2003 12:10:20 AM
From:Don Earl
Mark,

The last time I was running numbers on HD my best estimate of off balance sheet
debt was a minimum of $4 billion. Their filings are a joke when it comes to
disclosure, or I would give you better numbers. Accounts payable have increased
by $2 billion in the 9 months ended November 3, and a 10% drop in same store
sales is NOT what you want to see at peak inventory levels, especially when the
inventory still has to be paid for.

Home Depot made a lot of really dumb moves this year that dumped a ton of their
business right in Lowe's lap. You don't win that much lost business back
overnight, if ever. They took deep cutbacks in inventory and staff right at the
peak of the building season and the delayed reaction you can expect to see from
those kind of mistakes are starting to show up in their results.

I think it's also worth mentioning that HD is a relatively recent addition to
the Dow. Unlike the majority of the index, which has been around long enough to
weather some very tough business cycles, Home Depot has only been measured
against a backdrop of near perfect conditions in their market. What happens if
same store sales drop another 10% due to a slow down in construction spending
or higher interest rates? What happens if they have to shut down under
performing locations and those off balance sheet leases have to be settled?
What happens if the inventory sits on the shelf long enough that it has to be
paid for? My guess is Home Depot could easily follow in K-Mart's footsteps
within 2 years. While we're at it, that $5 billion plus in accounts payable
leaves a lot of other highly leveraged large caps with their necks sticking way
out there where they don't belong.

"IF" I absolutely had to own any Dow stocks right now based on price, I'd
definitely put off a trip to the hardware store until at least next Summer, and
have a Big Mac with Mickey Mouse instead, probably on an airplane.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/4/2003 12:53:29 AM
From:James Clarke
great post. Not saying I agree with you, I don't know HD well enough and I'm a
small cap manager so have no reason to, but great post
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/4/2003 6:57:36 AM
From:Dave
Don,

I've been thinking about buying some Home Depot and would you be willing to
mention a few of their "really dumb moves"?
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/4/2003 10:32:41 AM
From:Mark Marcellus
Don,

For off balance sheet debt, I get 4.4 Billion at the end of FY '01, which is
actually down slightly from FY '00. With cash of 2.5B, operating cash flow of
6B, PP&E of 15.3B, and LT debt of 1.5B, this really isn't unreasonable, IMO,
even if you look at this as real debt (which you should). I should mention that
I don't have the same issues with the operating leases, conceptually at least,
that you do. It does seem to me a legitimate way of structuring these things.
The fact that analysts are too lazy or stupid to include them in debt totals is
a separate matter that doesn't invalidate the concept itself, in my mind.

Re the management, that's really the issue. I've looked at it and I think that
the problems they are experiencing are inherited from the old management, which
clung to a 1980's style retail model for far too long. I think the moves that
Nardelli has made are intelligent responses to the current environment that
will pay off in the long run. Others (including many current and former HD
employees) would beg to differ. Time will tell. For that matter, I will
certainly be revisiting this when the FY '02 10k comes out.

There are a couple of what I consider to be common misconceptions with this
company. First, SSS is not the big issue here. Rightly or wrongly, the company
is aggressively cannibalizing sales in their existing store base. (For that
matter, the bar on comps is set pretty high for this quarter, and will continue
to be into next year.) The big issue is the company's ability in the long term
to continue to increase overall sales and cash flow, how they do it is
relatively unimportant. Second, this is not primarily a Lowe's vs. HD story.
The hard lines sector is very fragmented, and between them Lowe's and HD have
less than 20% of their market. Certainly they will compete head to head in many
cases, but there is plenty of room for both of them to grow.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/4/2003 12:36:00 PM
From:Paul Senior
Scott Mc: I looked at Lowe's. It seems to be the stronger company. For example,
it appears to me to have generally increasing profit margins, whereas that's
not so as I look at HD. Plus it's certainly the analyst darling now after HD's
missteps.

Still, HD has a lower p/e and lower p/sales number. And is the dominant player
(so far, -g-) and sells at a five-year low. And it too has room to grow in the
still-fragmented market. Therefore my choice.

Also, fwiw and as I've alluded to before, I try not to look at stock selection
within a sector where one pick is right or the best, and another is wrong or
not as good. So it's possible to me that both HD and LOW could be good enough
picks now. (Or neither be good enough picks.) For me, I'd want to see LOW drop
more in price before I'd be a buyer.

Paul Senior
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/4/2003 12:49:01 PM
From:Paul Senior
Spekulatius, re: DCX, DRRA. Nice little pop there on your Xmas choice of DCX.
I'll keep DCX on my watch list.

Meanwhile as regards auto suppliers, I've added to my very small position in
risky DRRA. Its financial leverage cuts two ways: I don't like all the debt;
otoh, if analysts are right and earnings come through, the p/e will be very
low. I like the very low p/sales numbers also.

http://finance.yahoo.com/q?s=dcx+drra&d=t
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/4/2003 2:49:03 PM
From:Spekulatius
Paul, regarding the trading versus investing strategy -
I personally do like to flip my stocks (bought for valuation reasons) if i
consider the gains attractive enough. I see this as an very effective bear
market strategy since it takes advantage of the volatility, with the assumption
that there will be more opportunities to buy the same or equally attractive
value stocks again. i do acknowledge that this would not work in a bull market
though. As far as diversification is concerned, i do consider a broad
diversification a good defense against overconfidence which is as prevalent
with value investors as with momentum investors. However the account size
usually keeps a lid on this, so that the fees are less than 1% if the
investment (my personal cutoff).
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/4/2003 5:28:38 PM
From:chaz
Timba...

 Since I've set up spreadsheets to assist with the calculations

I've not the least idea how to use a spreadsheet, but do know it's essential to
this work. If any of you would like to use PM's to help me discover more I'd
surely appreciate it.

There must be many ways they are useful in financial analysis, but what's a
good way to start?

chaz
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/4/2003 5:32:22 PM
From:Don Earl
Mark,

In general, an established retail operation will typically see annual growth in
the 4-6% range. 5% is about average and is about what they have to do to
maintain a constant customer base while making up for inflation. Anything under
2% suggests problems, and a negative 10% is a blood bath.

I spend a lot of time reading SEC filings and virtually the only reason I read
them is to find reasons why not to buy stock in a particular company. What I'm
looking for are places where the numbers don't add up, and places where
accounting tricks make things look better than they are. It's often hard for me
to communicate exactly why the numbers don't add up after a quick look because
the process has become so automatic it takes place more at a gut level, but if
there is adequate disclosure, I can normally dig it out through some number
crunching.

After recent discussions, I pulled up the 10K for FY 1992 as I'm sometimes able
to hit pay dirt by going through older filings. The most interesting item I ran
across was disclosure on average new store costs. In 1992 the average cost to
build and stock a new store was a tad under $16 million each. In 2002, capex
was expected to be $3.6 billion to open 200 new stores, which works out to $18
million each. It just plain isn't possible for them to be building stores for
only 15% above the costs of 10 years ago. The cost of building materials, labor
and real estate have at least doubled in that period of time. At $30 million
per store, which I would consider to be a low estimate, the cost to build 200
new stores a year is $6 billion. Their operating results don't come any where
near covering that cost, but the money has to come from some place.

The bottom line is there is absolutely no good business reason to create
special purpose entities to shuffle liabilities off the balance sheet except to
deceive shareholders. Being the cynical individual that I am, I also tend to
assume I'm just looking at the tip of the iceberg when I run across these kind
of discrepancies. What it comes down to is if a company is afraid to disclose
the true condition of their company, I'm afraid to invest in it.

<<<I think the moves that Nardelli has made are intelligent responses to the
current environment that will pay off in the long run.>>>

For $30 million a year in compensation, Nardelli has managed to get same store
sales down 10% so far by cutting inventory by 15% and keeping staffing levels
below the minimum needed to service customers. You can't blame it on the
economy, because they service the only part of the economy that has remained
strong. This is against a back drop of Lowe's producing respectable same store
sales growth in areas which are demographically identical in most cases. The so
called canibalization spin doesn't account for the drop, because both companies
use the strategy, and where HD used to be up in that area, LOW is still up.
Nardelli tried to fix something that wasn't broken and got clobbered.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/4/2003 5:39:35 PM
From:TimbaBear
Chaz

How do you analyze your potential candidates now?

Do you have Excel on your computer?

Timba

(edit: Sorry thread, this was intended to go PM. Will correct for the next
post.)
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/4/2003 9:56:43 PM
From:Steve168
James, for small caps, the January Rally usually count for most of the gain in
the year. Are you seeing that happening this year? I did well last January by
buying small cap value stocks (near cash value, no debt). But I am not buying
this year yet because I expect more bad news such as unemployment number and
consumer confidence, etc. Thanks,
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/5/2003 12:58:54 AM
From:Mark Marcellus
Don,

I guess it boils down to the fact that, after reviewing the filings, I'm
inclined to trust management and you're not. You raise an interesting point on
the costs of store openings, although I can think of a few reasons why store
opening costs might have been moderated, e.g. economies of scale, opening
smaller stores, opening stores in more rural areas, the probability that they
were spending a lot more back then building out regional distribution centers,
etc. I'd also point out that the negative 10% is SSS, not overall sales, and
represents one quarter only (although the problems could certainly continue
into next year). I'm in this longer term, and a couple of bad quarters by
themselves aren't going to worry me too much. A big test will be how they do
the second part of next year when the comps get easier. In any event, most of
what you and I differ on is a matter of judgment, and you and I have obviously
judged differently.

However, while I concede that the jury is still out on the new management and
future prospects, I strongly disagree with your statement that HD wasn't
"broken". Their supply chain was a disaster, and it is going to take years to
get it fixed. That's one reason I'm willing to cut Nardelli some slack. The
slick magazines can talk all they want about Lowe's better looking stores, but
the real story behind their success is their superior distribution system. The
reason they can have more SKU's on hand and still do great turns is because
they have the infrastructure to back it up. HD's cowboy style of store
inventory management worked well for a while, and was a key to their early
success, but as they grew larger they were choking on it. Maybe Nardelli isn't
the man who is going to fix this, but someone is going to have to, and whoever
does is going to take some hits in the form of lower margins, out of stocks,
lost sales, etc. while they do it.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/5/2003 6:40:49 AM
From:Richard Query
Don,

I am confused on your post, I read that HD was ranked #1 in quality of
earnings.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/5/2003 11:05:59 AM
From:Bob Rudd
<<the real losers will be the small, independent hardward and lumber
companies>>Actually there really aren't any 'independent' hardware and lumber
co's to speak of...they're all affilliated with cooperative buying groups like
ACE that enhance buying power and help with best practices. While they've taken
lumps from the big boxes, I suspect there's a bit of bounce back in the offing:
When you go to Home Depot seeking help with a project, it's tough to find
someone...OTOH most hardware stores offer informed assistance that can save a
lot of time and hassle.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/5/2003 11:16:05 AM
From:Bob Rudd
Don: <<Accounts payable have increased by $2 billion in the 9 months ended
November 3, and a 10% drop in same store sales is NOT what you want to see at
peak inventory levels, especially when the inventory still has to be paid
for>>Actually you DO want to see payables rising with inventory because that
indicates that vendors are financing the inventory. In tough times, vendors
sometimes offer extended terms to retailers to get them to buy more. This is a
benefit to the retailer that improves turnover and return on invested capital.
The vendor, OTOH, may be considered to be stuffing the channel which is why an
outsize AR rise is such a red flag.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/5/2003 2:23:00 PM
From:Don Earl
Bob,

Personally, I wish the SEC would put an end to what amounts to watered down
earnings reports. It puts investors in the position of making buying and
selling decisions months before full disclosure is available in the quarterly
reports.

The increase in accounts payable is mainly the result of pushing out days
payable outstanding by around 10 days compared to a year ago. As of the end of
last quarter, inventory and cash both increased by about $1.5 billion, but
accounts payable increased by $2 billion. AP is very short term debt and is
what got K-Mart in trouble after a soft holiday season last year. My assumption
is a 10% drop in same store sales will chew up the cash cushion as the short
term debt comes due, while causing inventory problems at the same time. We'll
see.

Since we must be getting close to the 20 post limit, I'll toss out a few quick
question in response to Richard's post. Who did the report? How was it
compiled? And who paid for it?

Good luck to the HD longs.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/6/2003 11:50:08 AM
From:Wallace Rivers
Somewhat OT - Taxation of corporate dividends:
With the talk of taxation of corporate dividends to individuals being
eliminated, I have had not heard too much talk about some sectors which could
be hurt by this idea.
What would happen to the muni bond market, and the municipalities throughout
the country which benefit from the currently favorable tax treatment? How about
corporate bonds (if they would continue to be taxed)?
Were the taxation on corp. dividends to individuals to be eliminated, the tax
advantaged status of the two asset classes I just mentioned would exist no
longer.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/6/2003 12:03:11 PM
From:Rich B.
I just stumbled on to this thread. Looks interesting.

Is there a list of value stocks somewhere that you keep track of?
If I could just throw out a couple of my own .

FBC(own it)- regional bank in Michigan. Caught my attention 2 years ago when
they started putting small outlets in Walmarts. They have a high concentration
of home mortgages so their earnings have outpaced their piers this year. They
have over $13 in cash and are earning over $3/year. I loved them at $17 and
can't convince myself to sell at $22. Just added to S&P 600 end of last year.

ING ( don't own it yet) Looking for an insurance company to diversify my
holdings. Same kind of story, low p/e, over $4 of cash, good dividend(stock
price might get a boost if no-tax on it). Would appreciate any thoughts on this
one.

Thanks
Rich
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/6/2003 2:10:12 PM
From:Knighty Tin
WR, The munis and corporate markets would die ONLY if preferred stock dividends
are tax free. Not likely, IMHO, but then, it's not like this Administration
knows what they're doing.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/6/2003 2:29:28 PM
From:Paul Senior
States might have a lever to save muni's because states still do have the power
to tax corp. dividends and to increase those taxes. Even those states that are
now set up to mimic the federal 1040 can change their policies if backed into a
corner.

just my guess.

Paul Senior
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/6/2003 3:03:44 PM
From:Knighty Tin
Paul, What a turnaround that would be.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/6/2003 3:45:08 PM
From:Paul Senior
Rich B.(why are you stumbling?) Here's a list of stocks that 3 people posted on
this thread said they bought in 2002:

http://www.siliconinvestor.com/portfolio/detail.gsp?pid=9293156

I won't go through the derivation and rationale for the list now. Regarding the
porformance of stocks on the list -- I will only say this year ('02), unlike
past years, we've thankfully had no stocks go bankrupt.

And if a disclaimer is expected:
On this thread there are a number of different value techniques being employed,
evaluated, discussed, promulgated. The list is just the public list. Some
people here (maybe even many or most) might consider any or all of the stocks
on the list to be lousy, inappropriate or not value stocks at all, either when
those stocks were placed on the list or now. And these people may be right
given their methodologies. Each of us likely has our own private list.

Paul Senior
I've kept this public list.
All jmo. I am not the thread spokesperson.
And I'm wrong many, many times.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/6/2003 4:38:13 PM
From:Don Earl
OT dividends.

I ran across this article this morning:

http://www.nytimes.com/2003/01/06/politics/06BUDG.html?ex=1042520400&en=049250a
3770391d&ei=5035&partner=MARKETWATCH

Personally, I can't see much reason why the average Joe collecting .08 each on
100 shares of INTC will be getting overly excited. IMO a tax cut on gasoline
would be more exciting and would have an effect on the economy in less than a
year. My take is it's a red herring to draw attention away from an unprovoked
attack on Iraq.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/6/2003 5:28:56 PM
From:Solarity
. . . . . My take is it's a red herring to draw attention away from an
unprovoked attack on Iraq . . . .

Jeez, how lame. Like we're all gonna overlook a little war in the mideast
because of a Bush tax proposal! Gimme a break. Hope your stock analysis is
better than your political analysis.

FWIW, Iraq may not have provoked you but I'm plenty steamed at 'em!
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/6/2003 5:42:03 PM
From:Dale Baker
ING - I own shares at 16.75 and April 20 calls. If the balance sheet and other
reserves are strong enough now, ING should be a $25 stock this year. It's also
a nice hedge against the falling dollar since the Amsterdam trading determines
the price most days.

My full portfolio can be found every Saturday on the 50% Gains Investing
thread. MAXF is the largest holding but I am mostly value-oriented (though not
as strictly and religiously as some posters here - to each their own).
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/6/2003 7:58:10 PM
From:Don Earl
<<<Iraq may not have provoked you but I'm plenty steamed at 'em!>>>

Of course you are dear. Once a person's brain has been washed, ignorance and
prejudice is the last line of defense.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/6/2003 8:00:10 PM
From:Broken_Clock
LOL!
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/6/2003 10:25:00 PM
From:GemSeeker
>> Iraq may not have provoked you but I'm plenty steamed at 'em!<<

Solarity, you've probably heard the saying that "a conservative is a liberal
who's been mugged"? Well, a corollary to that bit of wisdom is, "a warrior is a
pacifist who has yet to experience terror".

Given sufficient time, Sadam would probably convert even Don to warrior status!
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/6/2003 10:26:11 PM
From:James Clarke
Expect REITs to also be hurt relatively because their dividends are already
only taxed once so they'd surely be exempted. Can't wait for the REIT sector to
break down so I can find some bargains there again - thats one of my forecasts
for 2003.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/6/2003 10:35:35 PM
From:James Clarke
I agree - I can't for the life of me understand why the President is making
dividends the centerpiece of his tax cut plan. They're throwing out this number
that it would boost the stock market by 10-20%, which is just silly in my view,
and the view of most people who know what the stock market is. He's surrounded
by some financially savvy people, which is why this surprises me. Just lower
every marginal rate 1 or 2%, which automatically lowers the tax rate on
dividends and short term capital gains too.

Think about how dividends work. Dividends are not taxed in a 401-K or IRA. Most
of the institutional money I manage professionally is tax-exempt to begin with.

A dividend tax exemption at the CORPORATE level - now that would change things
and change behavior and valuations, but would smell very different politically.
(like a REIT or a limited partnership, the money is taxed at the recipient
level but not at the corporate level)
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/6/2003 11:02:03 PM
From:Mark Marcellus
I'm also willing to bet that dividends would end up counting towards the AMT
amount, which would make the exclusion worthless for many of people affected.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/7/2003 7:24:09 AM
From:Don Earl
James,

<<<A dividend tax exemption at the CORPORATE level - now that would change
things and change behavior and valuations, but would smell very different
politically.>>>

I agree, although I have some trouble figuring out what impact, if any, it
would have on the economy. Generally, the pattern I notice is those companies
that pay the most dividends always seem to be those with the largest insider
ownership in the stock. Eliminating taxes at the corporate level might give a
company some cushion to increase dividends, but I don't see much of a boost for
capital spending. Most of the more capital intensive businesses don't pay much
in the way of dividends anyhow, and as you pointed out, the REITs are already
exempt.

At the individual level, there isn't any benefit to the average consumer to
speak of, and even if there were, there would be no effect before a year from
April at best. It would be a huge boon to the top richest 5% of the population
while putting the burden of making up the deficit on the other 95%.

Since the whole concept is basically sense free, and IMO has a low probability
of being signed into law, it's hard for me to view as anything other than a
political maneuver at a time when the media focus has been on troop movements
to the Middle East. The snipe hunt for the mystery bomb will end as snipe hunts
usually do, and there will still be a war. In the mean time, the real threat is
in Asia and I find it interesting to note there doesn't seem to be as much name
calling when there really are weapons of mass destruction involved. An atomic
bomb over Tokyo probably won't do much for stock prices even with a tax cut.
Although combined with a war in Iraq, $3 a gallon gas isn't out of the
question.
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/7/2003 9:39:32 AM
From:Jurgis Bekepuris
>$3 a gallon gas isn't out of the question

If I believed $3 a gallon gas, I would take market neutral position. If I knew
for sure, well, I would short... no I would speculate in the futures. :-)))

Jurgis - but I don't speculate... well, almost... :-)
%EOM----------------------

%BOM---------------------
Date:1/7/2003 2:33:25 PM
From:Paul Senior
fwiw: hoyasaxa, I'll take on a very small exploratory position in LH now. LH
would seem to provide a necessary service, one that grows with complexity of
medical procedures. I agree that company has "impressively performed" in recent
years. And p/e is reasonable if business continues and company can continue
bottom line performance. At this time though, I still don't understand LH's
business strategy or how government reimbursement policies might or might not
affect LH business. If the key is to monitor LH pricing and volume trends, I am
hoping I will see that show in operating and profit margins - numbers which are
more readily available to me. If pricing/vol numbers worsen, I will have to
hope I catch and react to margin degradation before the stock drops.

I still like CRO's QTRN and KNDL and am unprofitably holding small positions
there.

http://finance.yahoo.com/q?s=lh+qtrn+kndl&d=t
%EOM----------------------

